Hawaii statutes.
[§507-70] Self-storage contracts. (a)
Each contract for the rental or lease of individual storage space in a
self-service storage facility shall be in writing and shall contain, in
addition to the provisions otherwise required or permitted by law to be
included, a statement that the occupant's property will be subject to a claim
of lien and may be sold to satisfy the lien if the rent or other charges due
remain unpaid for fifteen consecutive days and that such actions are authorized
by this part.

(b) This part shall not apply, and the lien
authorized by this part shall not attach, unless the rental agreement or
supporting documentation requests, and provides space for, the occupant to give
the name and address of another person to whom notices required to be given
under this part may be sent. If both an address and an alternative address are
provided by the occupant, notices pursuant to sections 507-63 or 507-64 shall
be sent to both addresses. If both addresses are provided by the occupant, the
owner shall send the final demand and notice of sale, pursuant to section
507-65, to both addresses by certified mail, postage prepaid. Failure of an
occupant to provide an alternative address shall not affect an owner's remedies
under this part or under any other provision of law. [L 1984, c 239, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next